Utah statutes.
32B-6-902.   Definitions.

(1) (a)  As used in this part, "grandfathered bar structure" means a bar structure in a licensed premises of a beer-only restaurant licensee that:

(i)  was licensed as an on-premise beer retailer as of August 1, 2011, and as of August 1, 2011:

(A)  is operational;

(B)  has facilities for the dispensing or storage of an alcoholic product that do not meet the requirements of Subsection 32B-6-905(12)(a)(ii); and

(C)  in accordance with Subsection 32B-6-703(2)(e), notifies the department that effective March 1, 2012, the on-premise beer retailer licensee will seek to be licensed as a beer-only restaurant; or

(ii)  is a bar structure grandfathered under Section 32B-6-409.

(b)  "Grandfathered bar structure" does not include a grandfathered bar structure described in Subsection (1)(a) on or after the day on which a restaurant remodels the grandfathered bar structure, as defined by rule made by the commission.

(2)  Subject to Subsection (1)(b), a grandfathered bar structure remains a grandfathered bar structure notwithstanding whether a restaurant undergoes a change of ownership.

